Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 32 Proof of Financial Responsibility for the Future

31-32-1.
Applicability.

The provisions of this chapter requiring the deposit of proof of financial responsibility for the future, subject to certain exemptions, shall apply with respect to persons who have been convicted of or forfeited bail for certain offenses under motor vehicle laws, or who have failed to pay judgments upon causes of action arising out of ownership, maintenance, or use of vehicles of a type subject to registration under the laws of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2.

31-32-2.
“Proof of financial responsibility for the future” defined.

“Proof of financial responsibility for the future”, as used in this chapter, means proof of ability to respond in damages for liability, on account of accidents occurring subsequent to the effective date of the proof, arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a vehicle of a type subject to registration under the laws of this state, in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident, and, subject to the limit for one person, in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) because of bodily injury to or death of two (2) or more persons in any one accident, and in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one accident or seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) combined single limit.

Wherever used in this chapter, “proof of financial responsibility” or “proof ” is synonymous with the term “proof of financial responsibility for the future”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-31-2

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-2

; P.L. 1964, ch. 171, § 2; P.L. 1968, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 81, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 3.

31-32-3.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases when used in this chapter for the purpose of this chapter, have the meanings respectively ascribed to them in this section:

“Judgment” means any judgment which shall have become final by expiration without appeal of the time within which an appeal might have been perfected, or by final affirmation on appeal, rendered by a court of competent jurisdiction of any state or of the United States, upon a cause of action arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of any vehicle of a type subject to registration under the laws of this state, for damages, including damages for care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person, or for damages because of injury to or destruction of property, including the loss of use of it, or upon a cause of action on an agreement of settlement for the damages.

“State” means any state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or any province of the Dominion of Canada.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-31-2

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-3

.

31-32-4.
Proof required under certain circumstances.

Whenever the license of any person is revoked pursuant to the provisions of §

31-11-6

, and whenever the division of motor vehicles, pursuant to the provisions of §

31-11-7

, suspends or revokes the license of an operator or chauffeur upon a showing by its records or other sufficient evidence that the licensee has committed an offense for which mandatory revocation of license is required upon conviction, the division of motor vehicles shall suspend the registration of all vehicles registered in the name of the person as owner.

Whenever under any other law of this state the license of any person is suspended or revoked by reason of a conviction or a forfeiture of bail, the division of motor vehicles may suspend the registration of all vehicles registered in the name of the person as owner if the administrator of the division of motor vehicles finds that the public safety so requires; provided, that:

If the owner has previously given or shall immediately give and maintain proof of financial responsibility for the future with respect to all vehicles registered by the person as the owner, the division of motor vehicles shall not suspend the registration unless otherwise required by law.

If a conviction arose out of the operation, with permission, of a vehicle owned by or leased to the United States, this state, or a municipality of it, the division of motor vehicles shall suspend or revoke the license only with respect to the operation of vehicles not so owned or leased and shall not suspend the registration of any vehicle so owned or leased.

Whenever the license of any person is revoked pursuant to the provisions of §

31-11-6

, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall require that person to maintain proof of financial responsibility for the future with respect to all vehicles registered by the person or owner.

Whenever the license of any person shall have been suspended for having violated any provisions of the motor vehicle laws other than those enumerated in §

31-11-6

, once within a period of twenty-four (24) calendar months, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles may in his or her discretion require the person to maintain proof of financial responsibility for the future with respect to all vehicles registered by the person as the owner. Whenever the license of any person shall have been suspended twice within a period of twenty-four (24) calendar months, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall require the person to maintain proof of financial responsibility for the future with respect to all vehicles registered by the person as the owner.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (c) of this section, whenever the license of any person is suspended pursuant to the provisions of §

31-27-2

or

31-27-2

.1, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall require the person to maintain proof of financial responsibility for three (3) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-26

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-4

; P.L. 1968, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 377, § 1.

31-32-5.
Suspension until proof furnished.

The suspension or revocation required under §

31-32-4(a)

, (b), and (c)(1) shall remain in effect and the division of motor vehicles shall not issue to that person any new or renewal of license, or register or reregister in the name of the person as owner of the vehicle until permitted under the motor vehicle laws of this state, and only if the person shall give and maintain proof of financial responsibility for the future; provided, that for a suspension under §

31-32-4(c)(2)

the division of motor vehicles shall in its discretion issue or renew a license of the person without maintaining proof of financial responsibility for the future.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-27

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-5

; P.L. 1970, ch. 279, § 2.

31-32-6.
Action in respect to unlicensed person.

If a person has no license, but by final order or judgment is convicted of or forfeits any bail or collateral deposited to secure an appearance for trial for any offense requiring the suspension or revocation of a license, or for driving a motor vehicle upon the highways without being licensed to do so, or for driving an unregistered vehicle upon the highways, no license shall be thereafter issued to that person and no vehicle shall continue to be registered or thereafter be registered in the name of the person as owner, unless he or she shall give and maintain proof of financial responsibility for the future.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-28

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-6

.

31-32-7.
Action in respect to nonresidents.

Whenever the division of motor vehicles suspends or revokes a nonresident’s operation privilege by reason of a conviction or forfeiture of bail, the privilege shall remain suspended or revoked unless the person shall have previously given or shall immediately give and maintain proof of financial responsibility for the future.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-29

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-7

.

31-32-8.
Courts to report nonpayment of judgments.

Whenever any person fails within sixty (60) days to satisfy any judgment, then upon the written request of the judgment creditor or his or her attorney, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the court in which the judgment is rendered within this state to immediately upon the request forward to the division of motor vehicles a certified copy of the judgment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-17

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-8

.

31-32-9.
Division of motor vehicles to notify licensing state.

If the defendant named in any certified copy of a judgment reported to the division of motor vehicles is a nonresident, the division of motor vehicles shall transmit a certified copy of the judgment to the official in charge of the issuance of licenses and registrations in the state of which the defendant is a resident.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-17

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-9

.

31-32-10.
Suspension for nonpayment of judgment.

The division of motor vehicles upon receipt of a certificate copy of a judgment shall immediately suspend the license and registration and any nonresident’s operating privilege, of any person against whom the judgment was rendered, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-18

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-10

.

31-32-11.
Exception in relation to certain vehicles.

The provisions of §

31-32-10

shall not apply with respect to any judgment arising out of an accident caused by the ownership or operation, with permission, of a vehicle owned or leased to the United States, this state, or a municipality of it, any ambulance owned by a hospital, or any motor propelled fire engines or other fire apparatus owned by volunteer fire companies whether incorporated or not, any motor vehicle owned by volunteer fire companies whether incorporated or not, any motor vehicle owned by a representative of a foreign country duly accredited to the United States government, nor any motor vehicle which is subject to the requirements of any of chapters 12 — 14 of title 39.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 33; P.L. 1955, ch. 3530, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-31-17

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-11

.

31-32-12.
Exception when consent granted by judgment creditor.

If the judgment creditor consents in writing, in the form that the division of motor vehicles may prescribe, that the judgment debtor be allowed a license and registration or nonresident’s operating privilege, those may be allowed by the division of motor vehicles, in its discretion, for six (6) months from the date of the consent and, until the consent is revoked in writing, notwithstanding default in the payment of the judgment, or of any installments of it as prescribed in §

31-32-17

, provided the judgment debtor furnished proof of financial responsibility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-19

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-12

.

31-32-13.
Exception when insurer liable.

No license, registration, or nonresident’s operating privilege of any person shall be suspended under the provisions of this chapter if the division of motor vehicles shall find that an insurer was obligated to pay the judgment upon which the suspension is based, at least to the extent and for the amounts required in this chapter, but has not paid the judgment for any reason. A finding by the division of motor vehicles that an insurer is obligated to pay a judgment shall not be binding upon the insurer and shall have no legal effect whatever except for the purpose of administering this section. Whenever in any judicial proceedings it shall be determined by any final judgment, decree, or order than an insurer is not obligated to pay the judgment, the division of motor vehicles, notwithstanding any contrary finding previously made by it, shall immediately suspend the license and registration and any nonresident’s operating privilege of any person against whom the judgment was rendered, as provided in §

31-32-10

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 13A; P.L. 1955, ch. 3530, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-20

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-13

.

31-32-14.
Duration of suspension for unsatisfied judgment.

The license, registration, and nonresident’s operating privilege shall remain so suspended and shall not be renewed, nor shall the license or registration be thereafter issued in the name of the person, including any person not previously licensed, unless and until the judgment is stayed, satisfied in full, or to the extent provided in this chapter, and until the person gives proof of financial responsibility subject to the exemptions stated in §§

31-32-12

,

31-32-13

, and

31-32-17

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-21

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-14

; P.L. 1964, ch. 218, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 398, § 5, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 399, § 5, effective July 14, 2021.

31-32-15.
Discharge in bankruptcy.

A discharge in bankruptcy following the rendering of the judgment shall not relieve the judgment debtor from any of the requirements of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-21

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-15

.

31-32-16.
Payment sufficient to satisfy requirements.

Judgments referred to in this chapter shall, for the purpose of this chapter only, be deemed satisfied:

When twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) has been credited upon any judgment or judgments rendered in excess of that amount because of bodily injury to or death of one person as the result of any one accident; or

When, subject to the limit of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) because of bodily injury to or death of one person, the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) has been credited upon any judgment or judgments rendered in excess of that amount because of bodily injury to or death of two (2) or more persons as the result of any one accident; or

When twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) has been credited upon any judgment or judgments rendered in excess of that amount because of injury to or destruction of property of others as a result of any one accident; or seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) combined bodily injury and property damage.

Provided, payments made in settlements of any claims because of bodily injury, death, or property damage arising from the accident shall be credited in reduction of the amounts provided for in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-22

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-16

; P.L. 1964, ch. 171, § 3; P.L. 1968, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 81, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 3.

31-32-17.
Installment payment of judgments.

A judgment debtor, upon due notice to the judgment creditor, may apply to the court in which the judgment was rendered for the privilege of paying the judgment in installments. The court, in its discretion and without prejudice to any other legal remedies which the judgment creditor may have, may so order and fix the amounts and times of payment of these installments.

The division of motor vehicles shall not suspend a license, registration, or nonresident’s operating privilege, and shall restore any license, registration, or nonresident’s operating privilege suspended following nonpayment of a judgment, when the judgment debtor gives proof of financial responsibility and obtains an order permitting the payment of the judgment installments, and while the payment of any installments is not in default.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 16; G.L. 1956, §§

31-32-23

,

31-32-24

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-17

.

31-32-18.
Action on default.

In the event the judgment debtor fails to pay any installment as specified by the order, then upon notice of default, the division of motor vehicles shall immediately suspend the license, registration, or nonresident’s operating privilege of the judgment debtor until the judgment is satisfied, as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-25

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-18

.

31-32-19.
Proof required for each registered vehicle.

No vehicle shall be or continue to be registered in the name of any person required to file proof of financial responsibility for the future unless proof shall be furnished for the vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-27

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-19

.

31-32-20.
Alternate methods of giving proof.

Proof of financial responsibility when required under this chapter, with respect to a vehicle or with respect to a person who is not the owner of a vehicle, may be given by filing:

A certificate of insurance as provided in §

31-32-21

or

31-32-22

;

A bond as provided in

31-32-27

;

A certificate of deposit of money or securities as provided in §

31-32-30

;

A certificate of self-insurance, as provided in §

31-33-9

, supplemented by an agreement by the self-insurer that, with respect to accidents occurring while the certificate is in force, the self-insurer will pay the same amounts that an insurer would have been obliged to pay under an owner’s motor vehicle liability policy if it had issued a policy to the self-insurer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-30

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-20

.

31-32-21.
Certificate of insurance as proof.

Proof of financial responsibility for the future may be furnished by filing with the division of motor vehicles the written certificate of any insurance carrier duly authorized to do business in this state certifying that there is in effect a motor vehicle liability policy for the benefit of the person required to furnish proof of financial responsibility. The certificate shall give the effective date of the motor vehicle liability policy, which date shall be the same as the effective date of the certificate, and shall designate by explicit description or by appropriate reference all vehicles covered by it, unless the policy is issued to a person who is not the owner of a motor vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-31

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-21

.

31-32-22.
Certificate furnished by nonresident as proof.

A nonresident may give proof of financial responsibility by filing with the division of motor vehicles a written certificate or certificate of an insurance carrier authorized to transact business in the state in which the vehicle, or vehicles, owned by the nonresident is registered, or in the state in which the nonresident resides, if he or she does not own a vehicle, provided the certificate otherwise conforms with the provisions of this chapter. The division of motor vehicles shall accept the certificate upon condition that the insurance carrier complies with the following provisions with respect to the policies so certified.

The insurance carrier shall execute a power of attorney authorizing the division of motor vehicles to accept service on its behalf of notice or process in any action arising out of a motor vehicle accident in this state.

The insurance carrier shall agree in writing that the policies shall be deemed to conform with the laws of this state relating to the terms of motor vehicle liability policies issued in it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-32

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-22

.

31-32-23.
Default by nonresident insurer.

If any insurance carrier not authorized to transact business in this state, which has qualified to furnish proof of financial responsibility, defaults in any undertakings or agreements, the division of motor vehicles shall not accept as proof any certificate of the carrier whether filed or tendered as proof after that time, so long as the default continues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-32

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-23

.

31-32-24.
“Motor vehicle liability policy” defined.

Certification. “Motor vehicle liability policy” as the term is used in this chapter means an “owner’s policy” or an “operator’s policy” of liability insurance, certified as provided in §

31-32-21

or

31-32-22

as proof of financial responsibility for the future, and issued, except as otherwise provided in §

31-32-22

, by an insurance carrier duly authorized to transact business in this state, to or for the benefit of the person named in it as insured.

Owner’s policy. The owner’s policy of liability insurance:

Shall designate by explicit description or by appropriate reference all vehicles with respect to which coverage is to be granted by it; and

Shall insure the person named in it and any other person, as insured, using any vehicle or vehicles with the express or implied permission of the named insured, against loss from the liability imposed by law for damages arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of that vehicle or vehicles within the United States of America or the Dominion of Canada, subject to limits exclusive of interest and costs, with respect to each vehicle, as follows:

Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident; and

Subject to the limit for one person, fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) because of bodily injury to or death of two (2) or more persons in any one accident; and

Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one accident or seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) combined single limit.

Operator’s policy. The operator’s policy of liability insurance shall insure the person named as insured in it against loss from the liability imposed upon him or her by law for damages arising out of the use by him or her of any motor vehicle not owned by him or her, within the same territorial limits and subject to the same limits of liability as are set forth above with respect to an owner’s policy of liability insurance.

Required statements in policies. The motor vehicle liability policy shall state the name and address of the named insured, the coverage afforded by the policy, the premium charged for that coverage, the policy period, and the limits of liability, and shall contain an agreement or be endorsed that insurance is provided under the policy in accordance with the coverage defined in this chapter as respects bodily injury and death or property damage, or both, and is subject to all the provisions of this chapter.

Policy need not insure under workers’ compensation law or employees. The motor vehicle liability policy need not insure any liability under any workers’ compensation law nor any liability on account of bodily injury to or death of an employee of the insured while engaged in the employment other than domestic of the insured, or while engaged in the operation, maintenance, or repair of any vehicle, nor any liability for damage to property owned by, rented to, in charge of, or transported by the insured.

Provisions incorporated in policy. Every motor vehicle liability policy shall be subject to the following provisions which need not be contained in it:

The liability of the insurance carrier with respect to the insurance required by this chapter shall become absolute whenever injury or damage covered by the motor vehicle liability policy occurs; the policy may not be cancelled or annulled as to the liability by any agreement between the insurance carrier and the insured after the occurrence of the injury or damage; no statement made by the insured or on his or her behalf and no violation of the policy shall defeat or void the policy.

The satisfaction by the insured of a judgment for an injury or damage shall not be a condition precedent to the right or duty of the insurance carrier to make payment on account of the injury or damage.

The insurance carrier shall have the right to settle any claim covered by the policy. If the settlement is made in good faith, the amount of it shall be deductible from the limits of liability specified in subsection (b)(2) of this section.

The policy, the written application for it, if any, and any rider or endorsement which does not conflict with the provisions of this chapter, shall constitute the entire contract between the parties.

Excess or additional coverage. Any policy which grants the coverage required for a motor vehicle liability policy may also grant any lawful coverage in excess of or in addition to the coverage specified for a motor vehicle liability policy, and the excess or additional coverage shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter. With respect to a policy which grants the excess or additional coverage, the term “motor vehicle liability policy” shall apply only to that part of the coverage which is required by this section.

Reimbursement provision permitted. Any motor vehicle liability policy may provide that the insured shall reimburse the insurance carrier for any payment the insurance carrier would not have been obligated to make under the terms of the policy except for the provisions of this chapter.

Proration of insurance permitted. Any motor vehicle liability policy may provide for the prorating of the insurance it provides with other valid and collectible insurance.

Multiple policies. The requirements for a motor vehicle liability policy may be fulfilled by the policies of one or more insurance carriers which policies together meet the requirements.

Binders. Any binder issued pending the issuance of a motor vehicle liability policy shall be deemed to fulfill the requirements for such a policy.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 21; G.L. 1956, §§

31-32-33

— 31-32-40; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-24

; P.L. 1968, ch. 7, § 2; P.L. 1976, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 167, § 3.

31-32-25.
Notice of cancellation or termination of certified policy.

When an insurance carrier has certified a motor vehicle liability policy under §

31-32-21

or

31-32-22

, and the certified policy is subsequently cancelled or terminated by the insurance carrier, a notice of cancellation or termination of the insurance so certified shall be filed, by the insurance carrier, in the division of motor vehicles. However, a policy subsequently procured and certified shall, on the effective date of its certification, terminate the insurance previously certified with respect to any vehicle designated in both certificates.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 22; G.L. 1956, § 31-32-41; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-25

; P.L. 2007, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 69, § 1.

31-32-26.
Chapter not to affect other policies.

This chapter shall not be held to apply to or affect policies of automobile insurance against liability which may now or subsequently be required by any other law of this state, and the policies, if they contain an agreement or are endorsed to conform with the requirements of this chapter, may be certified as proof of financial responsibility under this chapter.

This chapter shall not be held to apply to or affect policies insuring solely the insured named in the policy against liability resulting from the maintenance or use by persons in the insured’s employ or on his or her behalf of vehicles not owned by the insured.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 23; G.L. 1956, §§ 31-32-42, 31-32-43; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-26

.

31-32-27.
Bond as proof.

Proof of financial responsibility may be evidenced by the bond of a surety company duly authorized to transact business within this state, or a bond with at least two (2) individual sureties each owning real estate within this state, and together having equities equal in value to at least twice the amount of the bond, which real estate shall be scheduled in the bond approved by a judge of a court of record, which bond shall be conditioned for payment of the amounts specified in §

31-32-2

. The bond shall be filed with the division of motor vehicles and shall not be cancelable except after ten (10) days’ written notice to the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 24; G.L. 1956, § 31-32-44; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-27

.

31-32-28.
Recorded bond constitutes a lien.

The bond shall constitute a lien in favor of the state upon the real estate so scheduled of any surety, which lien shall exist in favor of any holder of a final judgment against the person who has filed the bond, for damages, including damages for care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person, or for damages because of injury to or destruction of property, including the loss of use of it, resulting from the ownership, maintenance, use, or operation of a vehicle of a type subject to registration under the laws of this state after the bond was filed, upon the filing of notice to that effect by the division of motor vehicles in the office of the town clerk or recorder of deeds in the town or city where the real estate shall be located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 24; G.L. 1956, § 31-32-44; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-28

.

31-32-29.
Action on bond.

If a judgment, rendered against the principal on the bond, shall not be satisfied within sixty (60) days after it has become final, the judgment creditor may, for his or her own use and benefit and at his or her sole expense, bring an action or actions in the name of the state against the company or persons executing the bond, including an action or proceeding to foreclose any lien that may exist upon the real estate of a person who has executed the bond.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 24; G.L. 1956, § 31-32-44; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-29

.

31-32-30.
Money or securities as proof.

Proof of financial responsibility may be evidenced by the certificate of the general treasurer that the person named in it has deposited with him or her sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) in cash, or securities, that may be legally purchased by savings banks or for trust funds of a market value of sixty thousand dollars ($60,000). The general treasurer shall not accept any deposit and issue a certificate for it and the division of motor vehicles shall not accept the certificate unless accompanied by evidence that there are no unsatisfied judgments of any character against the depositor in the county where the depositor resides.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 25; G.L. 1956, § 31-32-45; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-30

; P.L. 1968, ch. 7, § 3; P.L. 1976, ch. 314, § 1.

31-32-31.
Application of deposit.

The deposit shall be held by the general treasurer to satisfy, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, any execution on a judgment issued against the person making the deposit, for damages, including damages for care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person, or for damages because of injury to or destruction of property, including the loss of use of it, resulting from the ownership, maintenance, use, or operation of a vehicle of a type subject to registration under the laws of this state after the deposit was made. Money or securities so deposited shall not be subject to attachment or execution unless the attachment or execution shall arise out of a suit for damages.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 25; G.L. 1956, § 31-32-45; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-31

.

31-32-32.
Owner may give proof for others.

The owner of a motor vehicle may give proof of financial responsibility on behalf of his or her employee or a member of his immediate family or household in lieu of the furnishing of proof by any person. The furnishing of proof shall permit the person to operate only a motor vehicle covered by the proof. The division of motor vehicles shall endorse appropriate restrictions on the face of the license held by the person or may issue a new license containing the restrictions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 26; G.L. 1956, § 31-32-46; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-32

.

31-32-33.
Substitution of proof.

The division of motor vehicles shall consent to the cancellation of any bond or certificate of insurance, or the division of motor vehicles shall direct and the general treasurer shall return any money or securities to the person entitled to it upon the substitution and acceptance of other adequate proof of financial responsibility pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 27; G.L. 1956, § 31-32-47; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-33

.

31-32-34.
Requiring additional proof.

Whenever any proof of financial responsibility filed under the provisions of this chapter no longer fulfills the purposes for which it is required, the division of motor vehicles shall, for the purpose of this chapter, require other proof as required by this chapter and shall suspend the license and registration or the nonresident’s operating privilege pending the filing of other proof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 28; G.L. 1956, § 31-32-48; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-34

.

31-32-35.
Duration of proof — Cancellation or return.

The division of motor vehicles shall upon request consent to the immediate cancellation of any bond or certificate of insurance, or the division of motor vehicles shall direct and the general treasurer shall return to the person entitled to it any money or securities deposited pursuant to this chapter as proof of financial responsibility, or the division of motor vehicles shall waive the requirement of filing proof, in any of the following events:

At any time after one year from the date the proof was required when, during the one year period preceding the request, the division of motor vehicles has not received record of a conviction or a forfeiture of bail which would require or permit the suspension or revocation of the license, registration, or nonresident’s operating privilege of the person by or for whom the proof was furnished;

In the event of the death of the person on whose behalf the proof was filed or the permanent incapacity of the person to operate a motor vehicle; or

In the event the person who has given proof surrenders his or her license and registration to the division of motor vehicles.

Provided, that the division of motor vehicles shall not consent to the cancellation of any bond or the return of any money or securities in the event any action for damages upon a liability covered by the proof is then pending or any judgment upon any liability is then unsatisfied, or in the event the person who has filed the bond or deposited the money or securities has within one year immediately preceding the request been involved as a driver or owner in any motor vehicle accident resulting in injury or damage to the person or property of others. An affidavit of the applicant as to the non-existence of such facts, or that he or she has been released from all of his or her liability, or has been finally adjudicated not to be liable, for the injury or damage, shall be sufficient evidence of it in the absence of evidence to the contrary in the records of the division of motor vehicles.

Whenever any person whose proof has been cancelled or returned under subsection (a)(3) of this section applies for a license or registration within a period of the one year from the date proof was originally required, the application shall be refused unless the applicant shall reestablish the proof for the remainder of the one year period.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 29; P.L. 1953, ch. 3111, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 31-32-49; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-35

; P.L. 1978, ch. 309, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 494, § 1.

31-32-36.
Three-year requirement construed.

Whenever in the general laws there is a reference to a three (3) year requirement for financial responsibility, it shall be construed to be a one year requirement except as provided in §

31-32-4(d)

of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 309, § 3; P.L. 1986, ch. 494, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 377, § 1.